New Jersey, session 221, A3982.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. The Department of Education shall not require a teacher candidate seeking an instructional certificate with an elementary school teacher endorsement to achieve a minimum score on an individual subtest of a Commissioner-approved test on reading and language arts, mathematics, social studies, or science. b. The department shall require a teacher candidate seeking an instructional certificate with an elementary school teacher endorsement to achieve a minimum average score on the individual subtests of reading and language arts, mathematics, social studies, and science. The minimum average score shall be determined by the Commissioner of Education. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.